test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VLONG_makomii_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px3makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: omakomiienhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: omakomiienhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: omakomiienhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: imakomiiensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: imakomiiensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: imakomiiensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: imakomiiensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: imakomiiensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: imakomiiensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imakomiiensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imakomiiensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imakomiiensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imakomiiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imakomiiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imakomiiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imakomiiensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imakomiiensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imakomiiensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imakomiiensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imakomiiensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imakomiiensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: imakomiienhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: imakomiienhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: imakomiienhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: imakomiienhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: imakomiienhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: imakomiienhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imakomiienhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imakomiienhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imakomiienhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imakomiienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imakomiienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imakomiienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imakomiienhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imakomiienhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imakomiienhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imakomiienhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imakomiienhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imakomiienhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
